District of Columbia statutes.
48-853.04

Authority to access database.

A prescriber or dispenser authorized to access the information in the possession of the Program pursuant to this chapter may delegate, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Director to implement the provisions of this section, such authority to up to 2 health care professionals who are:

(1)

Licensed, registered, or certified by a health occupations board; and

(2)

Employed at the same facility and under the direct supervision of the prescriber or dispenser.

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-66, § 5, 61 DCR 7